Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-476.02
Suspension of operator's license, defined.

Suspension of operator's license shall mean the temporary withdrawal by formal action of the Department of Motor Vehicles of a person's operator's license for a period specifically designated by the department, if any, and until compliance with all conditions for reinstatement.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 71;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 9.